Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Salary and reimbursement. (a) Each employee other than the chief supervisor, lieutenant colonel, majors, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end corporals, and sergeants hereinafter designated shall be known as patrol troopers. (b) There may be appointed one lieutenant colonel; and such majors, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end corporals, sergeants, and troopers as the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the State Patrol. Persons in above-named positions shall be appointed by law and have such duties as the commissioner may direct and, except for troopers, shall be selected from the patrol troopers, corporals, sergeants, captains, new text begin lieutenants, new text end and majors who shall have had at least five years' experience as either patrol troopers, corporals, sergeants, or supervisors. (c) The salary rates for all State Patrol troopers, corporals, and sergeants shall be deemed to include $6 per day reimbursement for shift differential, meal and business expenses incurred by State Patrol troopers, corporals, and sergeants in the performance of their assigned duties in their patrol areas; business expenses include, but are not limited to: uniform costs, home garaging of squad cars, and maintenance of home office. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Salary and benefits survey. (a) By January 1 of 2021, 2024, 2027, and deleted text begin 2030deleted text end new text begin every odd-numbered year thereafternew text end , the legislative auditor must conduct a compensation and benefit survey of law enforcement officers in every police department: (1) in a city with a population in excess of 25,000, located in a metropolitan county, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, that is represented by a union certified by the Bureau of Mediation Services; or (2) in a city of the first class. The State Patrol must also be included in the survey. (b) The legislative auditor must base the survey on compensation and benefits for the past completed calendar year. The survey must be based on full-time equivalent employees. The legislative auditor must calculate compensation using base salary, overtime wages, and premium pay. Premium pay is payment that is received by a majority of employees and includes but is not limited to education pay and longevity pay. The legislative auditor must not include any payments made to officers or troopers for work performed for an entity other than the agency that employs the officer or trooper, regardless of who makes the payment. The legislative auditor must also include in the survey all benefits, including insurance, retirement, and pension benefits. The legislative auditor must include contributions from both the employee and employer when determining benefits. (c) The legislative auditor must compile the survey results into a report. The report must show each department separately. For each department, the survey must include: (1) an explanation of the salary structure, and include minimum and maximum salaries for each range or step; and (2) an explanation of benefits offered, including the options that are offered and the employee and employer contribution for each option. Wherever possible, the report must be designed so that the data for each department is in the same table or grid format to facilitate easy comparison. (d) By January 15 of 2021, 2024, 2027, and deleted text begin 2030deleted text end new text begin every odd-numbered year thereafternew text end , the legislative auditor must transmit the survey report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over the State Patrol budget. (e) It is the legislature's intent to use the information in this study to compare salaries between the identified police departments and the State Patrol and to make appropriate increases to patrol troopernew text begin , captain, and lieutenantnew text end salaries. new text begin Nothing in this subdivision precludes the collective bargaining of salaries or compensation in excess of salaries or compensation supported by the salary and benefits survey. Salary adjustments for supervisory ranks, including corporals, sergeants, lieutenants, and captains, must be proportionate to the salary adjustments made for patrol troopers resulting from the survey. This subdivision does not expand the scope of the salary and benefits survey beyond patrol troopers. new text end For purposes of this paragraph, "patrol troopers" has the meaning given in subdivision 2, paragraph (a). Sec. 3. Laws 2024, chapter 104, article 1, section 2, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. This section is effective the day following final enactment deleted text begin and expires January 1, 2032deleted text end . This section applies to contracts entered into on or after the effective date deleted text begin but before January 1, 2032deleted text end .